Maryland, session 2025, SB0137.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
7–206.1.
(a) An individual honorably discharged from military service may apply to obtain
a high school diploma if the individual withdrew from a regular full–time public or private
high school accredited by the State Board to enlist in the armed forces of the United States
during[:
(1) World War II;
(2) The Korean Conflict; or
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0137*

SENATE BILL 137
(3) The Vietnam Conflict] AN ARMED CONFLICT AUTHORIZED BY THE
PRESIDENT OF THE UNITED STATES OR CONGRESS.
(b) To obtain a high school diploma under subsection (a) of this section, the
individual shall apply to the county board in the county where the individual resides or
where the school from which the individual withdrew was located.
(c) Each county board shall adopt rules and regulations to establish procedures
for awarding diplomas under this section.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.